src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls-unacc/V-T-A-aistamatsi_gt-norm-unacc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

   Verb - ai'stamatsi - ok : # -m animate transitive verb, explain/demonstrate to AEW NA1
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Ind+1Sg+2SgO: kitai'stamatsoo
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Ind+1Sg+3SgO: nitai'stamatsaawa
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Ind+1Sg+4SgO: nitai'stamatsaayini
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO: kitai'stamatsooki
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Ind+2Sg+3SgO: kitai'stamatsaawa
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Ind+2Sg+4SgO: kitai'stamatsaayini
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Ind+3Sg+1SgO: nitai'stamatsooka
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Ind+3Sg+2SgO: kitai'stamatsooka
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Ind+3Sg+4SgO: ai'stamatsiyiiwa
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Ind+4Sg+3SgO: otai'stamatsooka
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Ind+4Sg+2SgO: kitai'stamatsookini
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Ind+4Sg+1SgO: nitai'stamatsookini
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Ind+4Pl+5Sg/PlO: ai'stamatsiyiiyi
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Ind+5Sg/Pl+4SgO: otai'stamatsookini
     
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Ind+1Pl+2PlO: kitai'stamatsoohpinnaana
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Ind+1Pl+3PlO: nitai'stamatsaannaani
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Ind+1Pl+4PlO: nitai'stamatsaannaani
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Ind+21Pl+3PlO: ai'stamatsaayi
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Ind+21Pl+4PlO: ai'stamatsaayi
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Ind+2Pl+1PlO: kitai'stamatsookihpinnaana
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Ind+2Pl+3PlO: kitai'stamatsaawaayi
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Ind+2Pl+4PlO: kitai'stamatsaawaayi
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Ind+3Pl+1PlO: nitai'stamatsookinnaani
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Ind+3Pl+2PlO: kitai'stamatsookoaayi
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Ind+3Pl+4PlO: ai'stamatsiyiiyi
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Ind+4Pl+1PlO: nitai'stamatsookinnaani
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Ind+4Pl+2PlO: kitai'stamatsookoaayi
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Ind+4Pl+3PlO: otai'stamatsookoaayi
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Ind+4Pl+5Sg/PlO: ai'stamatsiyiiyi
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Ind+5Sg/Pl+4PlO: otai'stamatsookoaayini
 
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Ind+Unspec+1SgO: nitai'stamatsookoo
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Ind+Unspec+1PlO: nitai'stamatsootsspinnaana
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Ind+Unspec+2SgO: kitai'stamatsookoo
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Ind+Unspec+2PlO: kitai'stamatsootsspoaawa
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Ind+Unspec+21PlO: ai'stamatsootssp
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Ind+Unspec+3SgO: ai'stamatsaawa
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Ind+Unspec+3PlO: ai'stamatsaayi
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Ind+Unspec+4SgO: ai'stamatsaayini
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Ind+Unspec+4PlO: ai'stamatsaayi

     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Cnj+1Sg+2SgO: kitai'stamatsoohsi
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Cnj+1Sg+3SgO: nitai'stamatsaahsi
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Cnj+1Sg+4SgO: nitai'stamatsaahsini
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO: kitai'stamatsookssi
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Cnj+2Sg+3SgO: kitai'stamatsaahsi
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Cnj+2Sg+4SgO: kitai'stamatsaahsini
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Cnj+3Sg+1SgO: nitai'stamatsiyssi
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Cnj+3Sg+2SgO: kitai'stamatsiyssi
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Cnj+3Sg+4SgO: otai'stamatsaahsi
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Cnj+4Sg+3SgO: otai'stamatsiyssi

     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Cnj+1Pl+2PlO: kitai'stamatsoohsinnaani
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Cnj+1Pl+3PlO: nitai'stamatsaahsinnaani
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Cnj+1Pl+4PlO: nitai'stamatsaahsinnaani
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Cnj+21Pl+3PlO: ai'stamatsaahsi
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Cnj+21Pl+4PlO: ai'stamatsaahsi
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Cnj+2Pl+1PlO: kitai'stamatsookssinnaani
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Cnj+2Pl+3PlO: kitai'stamatsaahsoaayi
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Cnj+2Pl+4PlO: kitai'stamatsaahsoaayi
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Cnj+3Pl+1PlO: nitai'stamatsiyssinnaani
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Cnj+3Pl+21PlO: nitai'stamatsookssi
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Cnj+3Pl+2PlO: kitai'stamatsiyssoaayi
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Cnj+3Pl+4PlO: otai'stamatsaahsi
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Cnj+4Pl+4PlO: otai'stamatsiyssi
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Cnj+4Pl+3PlO: otai'stamatsiyssi

     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Cnj+Unspec+1SgO: nitai'stamatsookoohsi
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Cnj+Unspec+1PlO: nitai'stamatsootssinnaani
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Cnj+Unspec+2SgO: kitai'stamatsookoohsi
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Cnj+Unspec+2PlO: kitai'stamatsootssoaayi
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Cnj+Unspec+21PlO: ai'stamatsootssi
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Cnj+Unspec+3SgO: ai'stamatsaahsi
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Cnj+Unspec+3PlO: ai'stamatsaahsi
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Cnj+Unspec+4SgO: ai'stamatsaahsini

     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Sbj+1Sg+2SgO: ai'stamatsiiniki
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Sbj+1Sg+3SgO: ai'stamatsaainiki
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Sbj+2Sg+1SgO: ai'stamatsookiiniki
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Sbj+2Sg+3SgO: ai'stamatsaainiki
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Sbj+3Sg+1SgO: ai'stamatsootsiiniki
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Sbj+3Sg+2SgO: ai'stamatsootsiiniki
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Sbj+3Sg+4SgO: ai'stamatsaasi
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Sbj+4Sg+3SgO: ai'stamatsootsiiniki

     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Sbj+1Sg+2PlO: ai'stamatsiinoainiki
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Sbj+1Sg+3PlO: ai'stamatsaainiki
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Sbj+2Sg+1PlO: ai'stamatsookinnaaniki
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Sbj+2Sg+3PlO: ai'stamatsaainiki
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Sbj+3Sg+1PlO: ai'stamatsootsiinnaaniki
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Sbj+3Sg+21PlO: ai'stamatsookisi
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Sbj+3Sg+2PlO: ai'stamatsootsiinoainiki
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Sbj+3Sg+4PlO: ai'stamatsaasi
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Sbj+4Sg+3PlO: ai'stamatsootsiinoainiki

     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Sbj+Unspec+1SgO: ai'stamatsookoiniki
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Sbj+Unspec+1PlO: ai'stamatsookoinnaaniki
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Sbj+Unspec+2SgO: ai'stamatsookoiniki
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Sbj+Unspec+2PlO: ai'stamatsookoinoainiki
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Sbj+Unspec+21PlO: ai'stamatsootsski
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Sbj+Unspec+3SgO: ai'stamatsaahki
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Sbj+Unspec+3PlO: ai'stamatsaahki

     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Imp+2Sg+1SgO: ai'stamatsookit
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Imp+2Sg+1PlO: ai'stamatsookinnaana
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Imp+2Sg+3SgO: ai'stamatsiis
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Imp+2Sg+3PlO: ai'stamatsiis
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Imp+2Pl+1SgO: ai'stamatsookik
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Imp+2Pl+1PlO: ai'stamatsookinnaana
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Imp+2Pl+3SgO: ai'stamatsiik
     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Imp+2Pl+3PlO: ai'stamatsiik

     ai'stamatsi+VTA+Der/Rcpr+VAI+Ind+1Pl: [ nitai'stamatsootsiiyihpinnaana , nitai'stamatsootsiiyihpinnaan ]
     
